Vermont statutes. Title 5 Aeronautics and Surface Transportation Generally
Subchapter 4. State Aid for Land Acquisition

§ 751.
Policy of State.

To provide for the orderly development of air facilities in this State and to cooperate with the national government by making available sites for airports, landing fields, air navigation facilities, and landing strips necessary for defense against an attack by sea or air, it is hereby declared to be the policy of this State to assist cities and towns or groups of cities and towns in the selection and acquisition of sites for development or expansion of airports, landing fields, and landing strips.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 222

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 752.
Use of appropriations.

No part of an appropriation provided for the purposes of sections 751-754 of this title shall be used for any purpose except for purchase of land or rights in land for airports, landing fields, and landing strips and for the payment of costs incidental to acquisition of land or rights in land.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 222

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 753.
Matching local funds.

Money from the appropriation shall be used to match, dollar for dollar, money appropriated, raised, or contributed by a local governmental unit, city or town, or by a combination of units for the purchase of lands or rights in land for airport, landing field, air navigation facilities, or landing strip purposes.
Variation of the above formula for State participation shall be permitted only in case of a site urgently needed by the air force or the national guard, and then only with unanimous consent of the Governor and the Emergency Board.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 222

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 754.
Title; taxation.

Title to land purchased in conformity with sections 751-753 of this title shall vest entirely in the State, jointly in the State and the local governmental units, or entirely in the local governmental units as in each case is most proper.
Land so acquired shall not be taxable, but when the title vests in the State or when the title is held jointly by the State and a town or towns, and the site is located in a different town or when the title vests in one or more towns and the site exists in a different town, then the holders of the title shall make an annual payment, instead of taxes, to the town in which the site is located of a sum equal to the tax otherwise assessed on the land alone.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 222

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.